Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4917.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; OPPORTUNITIES IN SCIENCE, INC.new text end new text begin $525,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Opportunities in Science, Inc., a 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization, to design and construct improvements of a capital nature at the Headwaters Science Center in the city of Bemidji, including rehabilitation or replacement of aging and failing infrastructure, including the roof, deck, and building envelope, and other site improvements to support ongoing operations. This appropriation is onetime and is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end